Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.230

Judicial information system consultation.

(1) Before ruling on an order under this chapter, the court shall consult the judicial information system to determine the criminal history, history of criminal victimization, history of being a respondent or petitioner in a protection order proceeding, or pendency of other proceedings involving the parties. The court may take judicial notice of a parallel criminal proceeding for the related conduct involving the same parties, including whether the defendant in that action waived speedy trial.

(2) Before granting an order under this chapter directing residential placement of a child or restraining or limiting a party's contact with his or her child, the court shall consult the judicial information system, if available, to determine the pendency of other proceedings involving the residential placement of any child of the parties for whom residential placement has been requested.

(3) When the court proposes to consider information from the judicial information system or another criminal or civil database, the court shall: Disclose the information to each party present at the hearing; on timely request, provide each party with an opportunity to be heard; and take appropriate measures to alleviate safety concerns of the parties. The court has discretion not to disclose information that the court does not propose to consider.

[ 2021 c 215 s 30.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.